Louisiana, session 2026, HB285.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:81(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§81. General powers of local public school boards
* * *
B.(1) Each school board may permit school buildings to be used outside of
regular school hours for academic purposes including but not limited to tutoring and
study hall. The board shall adopt rules and regulations governing the terms and
conditions, including fees if any, under which such buildings shall be used.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 285 ENROLLED
(2) Each school board may engage in a cooperative endeavor with a credit
union or bank to operate a branch at a high school. Any such cooperative endeavor
shall provide for the integration of the operation of the branch into the financial
literacy course required by R.S. 17:270 and provide students with the opportunity to
obtain the skills, knowledge, and experience necessary to manage their personal
finances and obtain general financial literacy as provided in R.S. 17:270.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.